New Jersey, session 221, S1234.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 2 of P.L.1985, c.233 (C.4:10-76) is amended to read as follows: 2.    a.  There is established in the Department of Agriculture the "New Jersey Wine Promotion Account," hereinafter referred to as the "account." All monies received in this account shall be expended by the Secretary of Agriculture for research and development concerning the viticultural and wine-making processes in the State and for the promotion of New Jersey wine, consistent with the recommendations of the New Jersey Wine Industry Advisory Council created pursuant to section 3 of P.L.1985, c.233 (C.4:10-77). b.    The account shall be credited annually, in an appropriation by law, with an amount equal to [$0.47] $0.875 per gallon on all sales of wines, vermouth , and sparkling wines sold by plenary winery and farm winery licensees licensed pursuant to R.S.33:1-10. c.     The account shall also be credited with any monies made available to it from the General Fund or any non-State public or private source. d.    The secretary shall include with the annual budget request for the department a request for funds sufficient to carry out the purposes and intent of P.L.1985, c.233 (C.4:10-76 et seq.). (cf: P.L.2001, c.323) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.